Mississippi statutes. Title 81. Banks and Financial Institutions
Subarticle E. Acquisition of Trust Assets.

§ 81-27-3.401.
Purchase of assets of another trust institution.

Subject to the provisions of this section, a trust institution may purchase assets of a state trust company or trust-related assets of another trust institution, including the right to control accounts established with the trust institution. Except as otherwise expressly provided by this section or another statute, the purchase of all or part of the assets of the trust institution does not make the purchasing trust institution responsible for any liability or obligation of the selling trust institution that the purchasing trust institution does not expressly assume. Except as otherwise provided by this chapter, this subarticle does not govern or prohibit the purchase by a state trust institution of all or part of the assets of a corporation or other entity that is not a trust institution.

If the acquiring institution is a state bank, a state trust company, an out-of-state trust institution which maintains neither a branch nor a trust office in this state, or a savings association chartered under the laws of this state, an application in the form required by the commissioner must be filed with the commissioner for any acquisition of all or substantially all of (i) the assets of a state trust company or (ii) the trust assets of another trust institution. The commissioner shall investigate the condition of the purchaser and seller and may require the submission of additional information as considered necessary to make an informed decision. The commissioner shall approve the purchase if:

The acquiring trust institution will be solvent and have sufficient capitalization for its business and location;

The acquiring trust institution has complied with all applicable statutes and rules including without limitation any applicable requirements of Article 3 of this chapter;

All fiduciary obligations and liabilities of the parties have been properly discharged or otherwise assumed by the acquiring trust institution;

All conditions imposed by the commissioner have been satisfied or otherwise resolved; and

All fees and costs have been paid.

A purchase requiring an application pursuant to Section 81-27-3.401(b) is effective on the date of approval, unless the purchase agreement provides for, and the commissioner consents to, a different effective date.

The acquiring trust institution shall succeed by operation of law to all of the rights, privileges and obligations of the selling trust institution under each account included in the assets acquired.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1998, ch. 437, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 1998.